District of Columbia statutes.
29-404.20

Resignation.

(a)

A member of a membership corporation may resign at any time.

(b)

The resignation of a member shall not relieve the member from any obligations incurred or commitments made prior to resignation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720